Louisiana, session 2026, HB827.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:2150, 2150.1, 2156(D), (E), (K)(1), 2156.1(A)(7), (B)(1), and (I),
2158(A)(introductory paragraph), and 2164(A), (B), (H), and (I) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 37:2155.1, 2156.1.1, and 2158(A)(24) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§2150. Purpose; legislative intent
The purpose of the legislature in enacting this Chapter is the protection of the
health, safety, and general welfare of all those persons dealing with persons engaged
in the contracting and plumbing vocation vocations, and the affording of such
persons of an effective and practical protection against the incompetent,
inexperienced, unlawful, and fraudulent acts of contractors or plumbers with whom
they contract. Further, the legislative intent is that the State Licensing Board for
Contractors shall monitor construction and plumbing projects to ensure compliance
with the licensure requirements of this Chapter.
§2150.1. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Apprentice plumber license" means the license that may be granted to
a natural person engaged in learning the plumbing trade by working under the direct,
on-the-job supervision of a journeyman plumber or master plumber, and in the
employ of an employing entity. Apprentice plumbers shall be placed in an
apprenticeship approved by the board.
(2) "Board" means the State Licensing Board for Contractors.
(2) (3) "Commercial" means any construction project except residential
structures intended to be primarily occupied as a residence with no more than two
separate dwelling units incorporated into one structure.
(3) (4) "Contract" means an agreement to perform a scope of work that is
regulated by this Chapter. The project value includes the entire cost of the labor,
materials, rentals, and all direct and indirect project expenses. The cost of materials,
rentals, and direct and indirect expenses shall be included regardless of who pays the
Page 2 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
costs or if they are donated. The "principal contract" is the agreement to perform the
entire scope of work for a construction project.
(4) (5)(a) "Contractor" means any person who undertakes to, attempts to, or
submits a price or bid or offers to construct, supervise, superintend, oversee, direct,
perform, or in any manner assume charge of the construction, alteration, repair,
improvement, movement, demolition, putting up, tearing down, furnishing labor, or
furnishing labor together with material or equipment, or installing material or
equipment for any of the following:
(i) Any building, highway, road, railroad, sewer, grading, excavation,
pipeline, public utility structure, project development, housing, or housing
development, improvement, or any other construction undertaking for which the
project value is fifty thousand dollars or more when the property is to be used for
commercial purposes.
(ii) Any new residential structure for which the project value is fifty
thousand dollars or more when the property is used for residential purposes.
(iii) Any improvements or repairs to an existing residential structure for
which the project value is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more.
(iv) Any mold remediation for which the project value is seven thousand five
hundred dollars or more.
(v) Any plumbing work.
(b) The term "contractor" includes persons who receive an additional fee for
the employment or direction of labor, or any other work beyond the normal
architectural or engineering services.
(c) A contractor holding a license in the major classification of hazardous
materials, or any subclassifications thereunder, is defined in terms of work
performed for which the project value is one dollar or more.
(d) "Contractor" does not mean any person, supplier, manufacturer, or
employee of such person who assembles, repairs, maintains, moves, puts up, tears
down, or disassembles any patented or proprietary equipment supplied by such
person to a contractor to be used solely by the contractor for a construction
Page 3 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
undertaking. "Proprietary" means specific and specialized equipment installation,
manufacturing processes, used, or components that are protected from disclosure to
third parties by the owner or manufacturer of the equipment.
(5) (6) "Controlled access" means the complete building or facility area
under direct physical control within which an unauthorized person is denied access.
(6) (7) "Electrical contractor" means any person who undertakes to, attempts
to, or submits a price or bid or offers to construct, supervise, superintend, oversee,
direct, perform, or in any manner assume charge of the construction, alteration,
repair, improvement, movement, demolition, putting up, tearing down, or furnishing
labor together with material and equipment, or installing the same for the wiring,
fixtures, or appliances for the supply of electricity to any residential, commercial, or
other project, for which the project value is ten thousand dollars or more. This
Paragraph is not deemed or construed to limit the authority of a contractor, general
contractor, or residential contractor, as those terms are defined in this Section, nor
to require such individuals to become an electrical contractor.
(7) (8) "Employee" means a worker whose employer deducts taxes from his
wages and reports his annual earnings to the Internal Revenue Service using a W-2
form.
(8) (9) "Executive director" means the person appointed by the board to
serve as the chief operating officer in connection with the day-to-day operation of
the board's business. The executive director is the appointing authority for all
employees of the board.
(9) (10)(a) "General contractor" means a person who contracts directly with
the owner. The term "general contractor" includes the term "primary contractor" and
wherever used in this Chapter or in regulations promulgated thereunder "primary
contractor" means "general contractor".
(b) "General contractor" does not mean any person, supplier, manufacturer,
or employee of such person who assembles, repairs, maintains, moves, puts up, tears
down, or disassembles any patented or proprietary equipment supplied by such
Page 4 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
person to a contractor to be used solely by the contractor for a construction
undertaking.
(10) (11) "Home improvement" means the reconstruction, alteration,
renovation, repair, modernization, conversion, improvement, removal, or demolition,
or the construction of an addition to any preexisting residential structure which
building is used or designed to be used as a residence or dwelling unit, or to
structures which are adjacent to such residence or building for which the project
value is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more. "Home improvement" does not
include services rendered gratuitously.
(11) (12) "Home improvement contractor" means any person who undertakes
or attempts to undertake or submits a price or bid or offers to construct, supervise,
superintend, oversee, direct, perform, or in any manner assume charge of a home
improvement project for which the project value is at least seven thousand five
hundred dollars but less than fifty thousand dollars. A home improvement contractor
shall not perform any structural work that is integral to the structural integrity of any
new or existing structure, including but not limited to footings, foundations, outside
walls, skeleton, bearing columns and interior load bearing walls, floor slabs, or
roofing systems to any type.
(13) "Journeyman plumber license" means the license that may be granted
to a natural person who possesses the necessary qualifications and knowledge to
install, alter, repair, and maintain plumbing systems; is supervised by a master
plumber; and is in the employ of an employing entity.
(12) (14) "License" means any form of license or registration the board is
authorized to issue in accordance with this Chapter.
(15) "Master plumber license" means the license that may be granted to a
natural person who possesses the necessary qualifications and knowledge to plan and
lay out plumbing systems; and who supervises journeyman plumbers in the
installation, alteration, or repair of plumbing systems.
(16) "Master plumbing contractor" means any person who undertakes to,
attempts to, or submits a price or bid or offers to construct, supervise, superintend,
Page 5 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
oversee, direct, perform, or in any manner assume charge of the construction,
alteration, repair, improvement, movement, demolition, putting up, tearing down,
furnishing labor, or furnishing labor together with material or equipment, or
installing material or equipment regarding plumbing in any structure or setting, and
is licensed by the board to do the same.
(13) (17) "Mechanical contractor" means any person who undertakes to,
attempts to, or submits a price or bid or offers to construct, supervise, superintend,
oversee, direct, perform, or in any manner assume charge of the construction,
alteration, repair, improvement, movement, demolition, putting up, tearing down, or
furnishing labor, or furnishing labor together with material and equipment, or
installing the same for the construction, installation, maintenance, testing, and repair
of air conditioning, refrigeration, heating systems, and plumbing for all residential,
commercial, and industrial applications as well as ventilation systems, mechanical
work controls, boilers and other pressure vessels, steam and hot water systems and
piping, gas piping and fuel storage, and chilled water and condensing water systems
and piping, including but not limited to any type of industrial process piping and
related valves, fittings, and components, for which the project value is ten thousand
dollars or more. This Paragraph is not deemed or construed to limit the authority of
a contractor, general contractor, or residential contractor, as those terms are defined
in this Section, nor to require such individuals to become a mechanical contractor.
(14) (18) "Mold remediation contractor" means any person who engages in
removal, cleaning, sanitizing, demolition, or other treatment, including preventative
activities, of mold or mold-contaminated matter that was not purposely grown at that
location for which the project value is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more.
Mold remediation applies only to the regulation of mold-related activities that affect
indoor air quality and does not apply to routine cleaning when not conducted for the
purpose of mold-related activities intended to affect indoor air quality.
(15) (19) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, association,
cooperative, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or
any other entity recognized by Louisiana law; and whether or not acting as a
Page 6 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
principal, trustee, fiduciary, receiver, or as any other kind of legal or personal
representative, or as a successor in interest, assignee, agent, factor, servant,
employee, director, officer, or any other representative of such person; or any state
or local governing authority or political subdivision.
(20) "Plumber" means a natural person who performs the work or business
of installing in buildings and on premises the pipes, fixtures, and other apparatus for
supplying water, or removing liquid waste or water-borne waste, and fixtures, vessels
and process piping that is in direct contact with products for human consumption.
(16) (21) "Plumbing contractor" means any person who installs, maintains,
and repairs potable and nonpotable tap water or sewer systems within a building
structure or residential structure for which the project value is ten thousand dollars
or more undertakes to, attempts to, or submits a price or bid or offers to construct,
supervise, superintend, oversee, direct, perform, or in any manner assume charge of
the construction, alteration, repair, improvement, movement, demolition, putting up,
tearing down, furnishing labor, or furnishing labor together with material or
equipment, or installing material or equipment regarding plumbing.
(17) (22) "Principal" means an owner, shareholder, or an officer or director
of a corporation; a member or manager of a limited liability company; a general
partner of a partnership; a sole proprietor; a trustee; or a full-time employee with
similar operational control or significant influence with respect to any person as
determined by the board.
(18) (23) "Qualifying party" means a natural person designated by the
contractor to represent the contractor for the purpose of complying with the
provisions of this Chapter including but not limited to meeting the requirements for
the initial license and any continuation thereof.
(19) (24)(a) "Residential contractor" means any person who constructs a
fixed building or structure for sale or use by another as a residence or who, for a
price, commission, fee, wage, or other compensation, undertakes or offers to
undertake the construction or superintending of the construction of any residential
structure which is not more than three floors in height, to be used by another as a
Page 7 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
residence, for which the project value is fifty thousand dollars or more. The term
"residential contractor" includes all persons who receive an additional fee for the
employment or direction of labor, or any other work beyond the normal architectural
or engineering services.
(b) "Residential contractor" includes both of the following:
(i) Any person bidding or performing home improvement for which the
project value is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more.
(ii) Any person performing the installation of a modular home with a value
equal to or greater than fifty thousand dollars for which the total project value shall
not include the cost of the component parts of the modular home in the condition
each part leaves the factory pursuant to R.S. 40:1730.71.
(c) "Residential contractor" does not include any person engaged in building
residential structures that are built to the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development's construction standards for manufactured housing as outlined
at 42 U.S.C. 5401 et seq., or mounted on a metal chassis and wheels.
(25) "Residential plumbing contractor" means any person who undertakes
to, attempts to, or submits a price or bid or offers to construct, supervise,
superintend, oversee, direct, perform, or in any manner assume charge of the
construction, alteration, repair, improvement, movement, demolition, putting up,
tearing down, furnishing labor, or furnishing labor together with material or
equipment, or installing material or equipment regarding plumbing in any residential
structure that is not more than three floors in height, to be used by another as a
residence, for which the project value is fifty thousand dollars or more, and is
licensed by the board to do the same.
(20) (26) "Residential roofing" means the construction, alteration, repair,
improvement, demolition, putting up, tearing down, furnishing labor, or furnishing
labor together with materials or equipment, or the installation of materials or
equipment for any phase of roofing specific to a residential structure for which the
project value is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more.
Page 8 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
(21) (27) "Residential roofing contractor" means any person who undertakes
to, attempts to, or submits a price or bid, or offers to construct, supervise,
superintend, oversee, direct, perform, or in any manner assume charge of a
residential roofing project for which the project value is seven thousand five hundred
dollars or more.
(22) (28) "Residential structure" means a building or structure that is used
primarily for occupancy by a person as a residence. Such structures or buildings
include but are not limited to single family dwellings and duplexes which are not
more than three floors in height and structures that are part of or adjacent to the
building or structures to be used as a residence. A residential structure more than
three floors in height may be built by a person holding a building construction and
residential construction license.
(23) (29) "Subcontract" means an agreement to perform a portion of the
scope of work contained in the principal contract including the entire cost of labor
and materials of that part of the principal contract which is performed by the
subcontractor.
(24) (30)(a) "Subcontractor" means a person who contracts to perform a
scope of work that is a part of the scope of work contained in the principal contract.
(b) "Subcontractor" does not include any person, supplier, or manufacturer
who assembles, repairs, maintains, moves, puts up, tears down, or disassembles any
patented or proprietary equipment supplied by such person to a contractor to be used
solely by the contractor for a construction undertaking.
* * *
§2155.1. Plumbing Contractors Subcommittee; membership; terms; powers; duties
A.(1) There is hereby established within the board the Plumbing Contractors
Subcommittee, hereinafter referred to as "plumbing subcommittee", consisting of
the following eleven members appointed by the governor, each of whom shall be a
resident of this state, and each of whom shall have been actively engaged in
plumbing or contracting for at least five years prior to his appointment by the
governor.
Page 9 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
(a) Three members, each of whom shall be appointed from the membership
of the Plumbing-Heating-Cooling Contractors Association of Louisiana.
(b) Three members, each of whom shall be appointed from the membership
of The United Association of Journeymen and Apprentices of the Plumbing and
Pipefitting Industry of the United States and Canada.
(c) One member who shall be appointed from the membership of the
Louisiana Associated General Contractors.
(d) One member who shall be appointed from the membership of the
Associated Builders and Contractors of Louisiana.
(e) One member who shall be appointed from the membership of the
Louisiana Home Builders Association.
(f) Two members, each of whom shall not be associated with the plumbing
industry, to serve as members-at-large.
(2) Each State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education district shall
be represented among the membership provided in this Subsection.
B.(1) The terms of office for the initial members appointed to the plumbing
subcommittee is three members for a three-year term, four members for a two-year
term, and four members for a one-year term, to be determined by the governor.
Thereafter, all members are to be appointed for six-year terms.
(2) All terms commence thirty days after appointment, and all members shall
serve until their successors have been appointed and qualified. Vacancies occurring
in the membership of the plumbing subcommittee for any reason shall be filled by
appointment by the governor for the unexpired term. No member appointed may
serve more than two consecutive six-year terms.
(3) A member may be removed by the governor for cause; or at the request
of the chairperson for failure to attend more than half of the regularly scheduled
meetings within a twelve-month period or for cause.
C. The executive director of the board shall serve as executive director of the
plumbing subcommittee and does not have voting privileges.
Page 10 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
D.(1) A member of the board shall serve as an ex officio member of the
plumbing subcommittee and shall serve as the liaison between the plumbing
subcommittee and the board. He shall be appointed by the chairperson of the board
and shall serve as the chairperson of the plumbing subcommittee. His presence at a
meeting of the plumbing subcommittee may be counted toward establishing a
quorum of the plumbing subcommittee, and he shall have voting privileges only if
either of the following circumstances exists:
(a) His presence is necessary to establish a quorum of the plumbing
subcommittee and there is a tie vote between the appointed members of the plumbing
subcommittee.
(b) His presence is necessary to establish a quorum of the plumbing
subcommittee, only one appointed member of the plumbing subcommittee is present,
and an additional ex officio member has been appointed pursuant to Paragraph (2)
of this Subsection.
(2) An additional ex officio member of the board shall serve on the plumbing
subcommittee only if his presence, along with the ex officio member serving
pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, is required to establish a quorum of the
plumbing subcommittee. This additional ex officio member shall be appointed by the
chairperson of the board and shall serve as the vice chairperson of the plumbing
subcommittee. He shall have voting privileges only if there is a tie vote between
appointed members of the plumbing subcommittee and the ex officio member
serving as chairperson of the plumbing subcommittee.
(3) The board shall pay per diem and travel expenses for ex officio members.
E. A quorum of the plumbing subcommittee consists of a majority of its
members and is sufficient to conduct plumbing subcommittee business. The
plumbing subcommittee shall meet at least once every other month to conduct its
business unless, for good cause, a meeting cannot be held. Notice of plumbing
subcommittee meetings shall be posted on the board's official website and at the
board's office at least ten days prior to the date when the plumbing subcommittee is
to meet.
Page 11 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
F. Each member of the plumbing subcommittee is entitled to a per diem
allowance of seventy-five dollars for each meeting he attends and to be reimbursed
for all travel expenses necessarily incurred in attending meetings.
G. Subject to the approval of the board, the plumbing subcommittee has all
of the following powers and duties:
(1) To adopt rules and regulations to govern all plumbing contractors,
apprentice plumbers, journeyman plumbers, and master plumbers in this state,
including all specialty classifications and sub-classifications of plumbing or
plumbing contracting as adopted by the board.
(2) To issue, suspend, or revoke licenses to do plumbing or plumbing
business in this state pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter.
(3) To prescribe and adopt regulations and policies for continuing education
for plumbers. However, notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the plumbing
subcommittee shall not approve for use by licensees any continuing education
courses or written training programs provided by a member of the plumbing
subcommittee, or by a legal entity in which a member has a controlling interest.
(4) To enforce against, prosecute, or enjoin all persons violating plumbing
or plumbing contracting provisions of this Chapter, and rules and regulations of the
board; to issue fines, penalties, and other costs for violations; and incur necessary
expenses therein.
(5) If an alleged violation is known to the plumbing subcommittee, the
plumbing subcommittee may correct it or take appropriate action without formal
complaint.
§2156. Applications; licenses; fees; renewals
* * *
D. The board may assess an additional surcharge of not more than four
hundred dollars in connection with the application for and issuance of a contractor's
or plumber's license to a contractor or plumber not domiciled in this state, to be
utilized to defray the additional cost of the investigation of the application of the
non-Louisiana contractor or plumber.
Page 12 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
E. When issuing a license to any contractor or plumber, the board shall state
the contractor's or plumber's classification on the license for which he has completed
all of the requirements.
* * *
K.(1) The board shall assess on each license renewal issued to a contractor,
except a plumbing contractor, an additional fee of one hundred dollars per year to be
dedicated and allocated as provided in this Subsection to any public university in this
state or any community college school of construction management or construction
technology in this state that is accredited by either the American Council for
Construction Education or the Accreditation Board for Engineering and Technology.
The board shall include on each license renewal form issued to a contractor an
optional election whereby the contractor may choose to not participate in the
remission of the additional one-hundred-dollar dedication fee.
* * *
§2156.1. Requirements for issuance of a contractor's license
A. To become licensed in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter, an
applicant shall make application to the board on a form adopted by the board and
shall state the classifications for which he is applying from the list of major
classifications listed herein or from the list of subclassifications and specialty
classification as adopted by rule. The major classifications are:
* * *
(7) Master Plumbing.
* * *
B.(1) An applicant for a contractor's license or registration shall submit a
financial statement on a form supplied by the board, current to within twelve months
of the date of filing the application, prepared and signed by an accountant,
bookkeeper, or certified public accountant and signed by the applicant, attesting the
statement is true and correct. In lieu of a signature by a certified public accountant
on the board's form, a current financial statement prepared by a certified public
accountant may be attached.
Page 13 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
* * *
I.(1) Any plumbing contractor who currently holds a Master Plumber
License from the State Plumbing Board of Louisiana shall be exempt from any trade
examination requirement. Any person or business that advertises, solicits,
undertakes, attempts, offers, or submits a price, bid, quote or estimate to construct,
supervise, direct, oversee, or perform any construction, modification, repair, or
maintenance of any portion of a plumbing system is required to hold the appropriate
plumbing contractor license, classification, subclassification, or specialty
classification.
(2) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to permit plumbing contractors
to perform plumbing work without first complying with the licensure provisions of
Chapter 16 of this Title, R.S. 37:1361 et seq. A master plumbing contractor may
contract to perform or supervise plumbing work for any structure. Master plumbing
contractor qualifying party status may be obtained only by a licensed master
plumber, and upon meeting all other requirements of licensure.
(3) A residential plumbing contractor may contract to perform or supervise
plumbing work only for a structure, not more than three floors in height, to be used
by another as a residence. Residential plumbing contractor qualifying party status
may be obtained by a licensed journeyman plumber or a licensed master plumber,
and upon meeting all other requirements of licensure.
* * *
§2156.1.1. Requirements for issuance of a plumber's license; violations; penalties;
classifications
A. Any natural person who engages in any plumbing work of any kind,
including as an employee of a plumbing contractor, is required to possess the
appropriate plumber's license. Licenses for plumbers shall be issued in accordance
with any of the following:
(1) An applicant for licensure as an apprentice plumber shall register with
the board in a method prescribed by the board and shall semi-annually verify his
Page 14 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
employment in the trade of apprentice plumber with the board in a method
prescribed by the board.
(2) An applicant for licensure as a journeyman plumber may obtain that
license from the board after the completion of two thousand hours of verified work
as an apprentice plumber, and after passing both a written examination and a
practical administration approved, recognized, or administered on behalf of the
board.
(3) An applicant for licensure as a master plumber may obtain that license
from the board after first becoming a licensed journeyman plumber, the completion
of one thousand hours of verified work as a licensed journeyman plumber, and after
successfully passing a written examination approved, recognized, or administered
on behalf of the board.
B. A person may not perform plumbing work, or act as a plumber as defined
in this Chapter, unless he holds an active license as a plumber in accordance with the
provisions of this Chapter. The board or plumbing subcommittee may revoke,
suspend, or refuse to renew a license; issue cease and desist orders to stop work;
issue fines and penalties; or debar any person licensed pursuant to the provisions of
this Chapter for a violation of any of the following requirements:
(1) An apprentice plumber shall work only under the supervision of a
journeyman plumber or a master plumber.
(2) A journeyman plumber may be supervised by another journeyman
plumber only if that supervising journeyman plumber is an employee of, or the
qualifying party at, a residential plumbing contractor.
(3) A journeyman plumber may be supervised by a master plumber who is
employed by or the qualifying party of a master plumbing contractor.
C. The plumbing subcommittee may promulgate rules and regulations for the
issuance of apprentice, journeyman, and master plumber licenses or temporary
working permits to persons possessing equivalent licenses or experience in another
state and that are applying to perform work in this state, as well as any additional
requirements or fees to be imposed for such a license or permit. Any rule or
Page 15 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
regulation promulgated pursuant to this Subsection shall comply with the Welcome
Home Act, R.S. 37:51 et seq., if applicable.
D. Additional requirements for the issuance of plumber's licenses may be
added by rule as the plumbing subcommittee deems appropriate.
* * *
§2158. Revocation and suspension of licenses; issuance of cease and desist orders;
debarment; violations; penalty; criminal penalty
A. No person may engage in the business of contracting, or act as a
contractor as defined in this Chapter, unless he holds an active license as a contractor
in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter. The board, plumbing
subcommittee, and residential subcommittee may revoke, suspend, or refuse to
renew a license; issue cease and desist orders to stop work; issue fines and penalties;
or debar any person licensed pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter for any of the
following violations:
* * *
(24) Undertaking, attempting, or submitting a price or bid or offers to
construct, supervise, superintend, oversee, direct, perform, or in any manner assume
charge of the construction, alteration, repair, improvement, movement, demolition,
putting up, tearing down, furnishing labor, or furnishing labor together with material
or equipment, or installing material or equipment regarding plumbing work without
holding the plumbing contractor license required for that particular scope of work.
* * *
§2164. Violations; civil penalty; jurisdiction
A. Any person who violates any provision of this Chapter shall, after notice
and a hearing, be liable to the board for a fine of up to ten percent of the total
contract or the value of the work bid or being performed for which there is a
violation. In addition to the fine, the board may impose administrative costs and
attorney fees for each offense. In determining the amount of the administrative
penalty, the board, plumbing subcommittee, or residential subcommittee shall
Page 16 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
consider the circumstances and seriousness of the violation, cooperation on the part
of the contractor, and the history of previous violations.
B. A monetary penalty assessed by the board, plumbing subcommittee, or
the residential subcommittee is payable within ninety days or as provided by law.
Failure to pay an outstanding penalty may be cause to deny issuance or renewal of
a license or registration and may be subject to collection efforts as provided by law.
* * *
H. Anyone violating this Chapter who fails to cease work, after proper
hearing and notification from the board, shall not be eligible to apply for a
contractor's license or a plumber's license for a period not to exceed one year from
the date of official notification to cease work.
I.(1) All fines or penalties collected by the board pursuant to the provisions
of this Section for violations of any provision of this Chapter, except for violations
related to plumbing or plumbing contracting, shall, annually, at each audit of the
board, be transferred to a separate contractor's educational trust fund to be used for
educational purposes as determined by the trustees of the fund. The Construction
Education Trust Fund shall make an audited financial report to the board annually.
(2) All fines or penalties collected by the board pursuant to the provisions
of this Section for violations related to plumbing or plumbing contracting shall,
annually, at each audit of the board, be transferred to the Louisiana Community and
Technical College System to be used exclusively for training programs related to the
plumbing trade.
* * *
Section 2. Part II of Chapter 24 of Title 37 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 37:2175.1 through 2175.10, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART II. LOUISIANA PLUMBING WORKFORCE ACCESS ACT
§2175.1. Short title
This Part shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana Plumbing
Workforce Access Act".
§2175.2. Definitions
Page 17 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
As used in this Part, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Approved institution" means a community college, vocational-technical
school, or correctional facility training program that has received board approval to
offer the Institutional Plumbing Pathway program pursuant to this Part.
(2) "Board" means the State Licensing Board for Contractors.
(3) "Competency checkpoint" means a standardized practical skills
assessment administered or certified by the board at defined stages of the
institutional pathway.
(4) "Industry rotation" means a structured period of supervised hands-on
work experience completed by an Institutional Plumbing Pathway student at a
participating licensed plumbing contractor's worksite.
(5) "Institutional Plumbing Pathway student" means a person enrolled in an
approved institution's program established pursuant to this Part.
(6) "LCTCS" means the Louisiana Community and Technical College
System.
(7) "Participating employer" means a licensed plumbing contractor that has
registered with the board to accept Institutional Plumbing Pathway students for
industry rotation as provided in this Part.
(8) "Returning citizen" means a person who has been released from a state
or federal correctional facility within the preceding five years.
§2175.3. Institutional Plumbing Pathway established
A. The board, in coordination with LCTCS, shall establish the Institutional
Plumbing Pathway as an alternative route to qualify for the journeyman plumber
examination. The Institutional Plumbing Pathway consists of three components:
(1) Classroom and laboratory instruction at an approved institution as
provided in R.S. 37:2175.5.
(2) Competency checkpoints as provided in R.S. 37:2175.6.
(3) Industry rotation as provided in R.S. 37:2175.7.
Page 18 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
B. Completion of the Institutional Plumbing Pathway satisfies the experience
and training requirements for application to sit for the journeyman plumber
examination in lieu of the employer-sponsored apprenticeship requirements.
C. All other requirements for journeyman licensure, including passage of the
journeyman plumber examination administered by the board, remain in full force and
effect. Nothing in this Part shall be construed to alter examination content, passing
standards, or the board's authority over licensure decisions.
D. A person who completes the Institutional Plumbing Pathway is eligible
to apply for any license classification established in accordance with this Chapter or
administered by the board, including any license classifications established by law
or rule on or after the effective date of this Part, if the applicant meets all applicable
requirements. The board shall determine eligibility, scope of work, and appropriate
level of licensure based on demonstrated competency, training, and experience.
E. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to waive or reduce any
examination, competency, supervision, or public safety requirements established by
either board.
§2175.4. Curriculum and laboratory standards
A. The board shall promulgate rules establishing minimum curriculum
standards for approved institutions. Such standards shall include, at a minimum, all
of the following:
(1) The Louisiana Plumbing Code, including all applicable state amendments
to the International Plumbing Code.
(2) Pipe systems, materials, and installation techniques for residential,
commercial, and industrial applications.
(3) Blueprint reading and plumbing system design.
(4) Workplace safety, including Occupational Safety and Health
Administration standards applicable to plumbing work.
(5) Applied mathematics for the trades.
(6) Water supply, drainage, waste, and venting systems.
(7) Medical gas systems and specialty installations, at the board's discretion.
Page 19 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
B. An approved institution shall maintain laboratory facilities sufficient to
allow students to develop hands-on competency in pipe fitting, fixture installation,
and system assembly under the supervision of a licensed master plumber or licensed
journeyman plumber employed by the institution.
C. An institution seeking approval shall submit its proposed curriculum to
the board for review. The board shall approve, conditionally approve, or deny the
application within ninety days of receipt and shall provide written findings
supporting its decision.
D. Approved institutions shall be subject to periodic review by the board no
less frequently than every three years. The board may revoke or suspend approval
for material deficiencies in curriculum, facilities, or instructional quality.
§2175.5. Competency checkpoints
A. The board shall establish a series of not fewer than three competency
checkpoints to be completed by Institutional Plumbing Pathway students at defined
stages of the program. Competency checkpoints shall assess practical skills in
accordance with standards promulgated by the board.
B. Competency checkpoints shall be administered by board-certified
assessors and shall be independent of the approved institution. No approved
institution employee shall serve as the sole assessor for that institution's own
students.
C. A student who fails a competency checkpoint may remediate and retake
the assessment in accordance with rules promulgated by the board. An approved
institution shall provide remediation support for a student who does not pass.
D. Successful completion of all required competency checkpoints shall be
documented by the board and constitutes official verification of the student's
practical competency for purposes of qualification to sit for the journeyman plumber
examination.
§2175.6. Industry rotation program
A. As a component of the Institutional Plumbing Pathway, a student shall
complete a minimum of two thousand hours of industry rotation across at least three
Page 20 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
participating employers, with no single employer providing more than one thousand
of the required rotation hours.
B. Industry rotation shall expose the student to a range of plumbing
applications. An approved institution shall endeavor to ensure that each student
completes rotation hours in at least two of the following categories:
(1) Residential new construction.
(2) Residential service and repair.
(3) Commercial construction.
(4) Industrial or institutional applications.
C. A participating employer shall do all of the following:
(1) Register with the board and maintain a current registration in good
standing.
(2) Assign a licensed journeyman or master plumber to directly supervise
each institutional pathway student at all times during industry rotation.
(3) Submit quarterly hour verification reports to the board in a form
prescribed by the board.
(4) Certify that the student's work during rotation meets applicable safety
and workmanship standards.
D. Rotation hours are portable. If a student's rotation with one participating
employer is interrupted for any reason, documented hours shall be credited toward
the student's total and shall not be forfeited upon transfer to another participating
employer.
§2175.7. Returning citizen pathway
A. The board shall authorize approved institutions to include correctional
facilities operating under the jurisdiction of the Louisiana Department of Public
Safety and Corrections as delivery sites for the pre-apprenticeship and classroom
components of the Institutional Plumbing Pathway.
B. A person incarcerated in a Louisiana correctional facility who completes
a board-approved pre-apprenticeship plumbing program while incarcerated shall
receive all of the following:
Page 21 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
(1) Credit toward the classroom and laboratory instruction component of the
Institutional Plumbing Pathway upon release.
(2) Automatic registration as an Institutional Plumbing Pathway student
upon release, subject to any applicable licensing restrictions imposed by the board
related to the nature of prior convictions.
(3) Eligibility to complete the industry rotation component through
participating employers at no additional registration fee for a period of two years
following release.
C. The board shall not deny licensure to a returning citizen solely on the
basis of a prior conviction unless the conviction is directly and substantially related
to the duties and responsibilities of a licensed plumber, as determined by the board
in accordance with R.S. 37:2950.
D. Louisiana Works and the Reentry Advisory Council shall collaborate with
the board to develop outreach, support services, and employer recruitment specific
to the returning citizen pathway established by this Section.
§2175.8. Louisiana equivalency examination for out-of-state licensees
A. A person who holds a current and valid journeyman or master plumber
license in good standing in another state may apply for licensure in this state by
equivalency examination, in lieu of completing the Institutional Plumbing Pathway
or an employer-sponsored apprenticeship.
B. The equivalency examination shall test the applicant's knowledge of all
of the following:
(1) Amendments to the International Plumbing Code specific to this state.
(2) Administrative licensing requirements and board rules applicable to this
state.
(3) Any specific construction or environmental conditions relevant to
plumbing practice in this state.
C. An applicant who passes the equivalency examination and satisfies all
other board requirements, including applicable background checks and fees, shall be
Page 22 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
issued a journeyman or master plumber license at the level commensurate with the
applicant's out-of-state license.
D. The board shall promulgate rules establishing the content, passing score,
and administration of the equivalency examination within one hundred eighty days
of the effective date of this Part.
§2175.9. Financial assistance
A. Louisiana Works, in coordination with LCTCS and the board, may
develop a financial assistance program for Institutional Plumbing Pathway students
who demonstrate financial need. The program may include any of the following:
(1) Stipends for students during the industry rotation component.
(2) Reimbursement of examination fees for students who pass the
journeyman or master plumber examination on the first attempt.
(3) Low-interest loans for tools, equipment, and program-related expenses.
B. A student who receives financial assistance from a program created
pursuant to this Section and becomes licensed in this state shall commit to working
as a licensed plumber in this state for not fewer than two years following licensure
as a condition of assistance. Louisiana Works may promulgate rules governing
repayment obligations for a student who does not satisfy this commitment.
C. Financial assistance in accordance with this Section shall be funded
through appropriations made by the legislature. Louisiana Works shall report
annually to the legislature on the number of students assisted, pass rates, and
licensure outcomes.
§2175.10. Rulemaking; implementation
A. The board shall promulgate all rules necessary to implement this Part in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq. Initial rules
shall be promulgated within one hundred eighty days of the effective date of this
Part.
B. The board shall submit an annual report to the legislature and the
governor, not later than February first of each year, beginning in the year following
the first full year of program operation, which shall include all of the following:
Page 23 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
(1) The number of approved institutions and their locations.
(2) Enrollment and completion rates, disaggregated by race, gender,
geographic region, veteran status, and returning citizen status.
(3) Journeyman examination pass rates for Institutional Plumbing Pathway
graduates compared to traditional apprentices.
(4) The number of participating employers and employer tax credits claimed.
(5) Recommendations for program improvements.
C. The board may enter into interagency agreements with LCTCS, the
Louisiana Department of Public Safety and Corrections, Louisiana Works, and the
Louisiana Department of Revenue as necessary to implement this Part.
Section 3. Chapter 16 of Title 37 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 37:1361 through 1380, is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 4. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby directed to make technical
changes to statutory laws as necessary to reflect the succession of the State Plumbing Board
by the State Licensing Board for Contractors as provided in this Act.
Section 5. Any person licensed in this state as an apprentice plumber, journeyman
plumber, or master plumber by the State Plumbing Board on or before December 31, 2026,
shall hold the equivalent license of the State Licensing Board for Contractors created by this
Act on January 1, 2027.
Section 6.(A) On the effective date of this Section, the State Plumbing Board is
abolished and its duties and functions shall be transferred to the State Licensing Board for
Contractors. All unfinished business, references in laws and documents, employees,
property, obligations, and books and records heretofore under the control of the State
Plumbing Board shall be transferred to the State Licensing Board for Contractors as
provided in this Section.
(B) Unfinished business. Upon the transfer of duties and functions as provided in
this Section, any pending or unfinished business of the State Plumbing Board shall be taken
over and completed by the State Licensing Board for Contractors. The State Licensing Board
for Contractors is the successor in every way to the State Plumbing Board.
Page 24 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
(C) References in laws and documents. Wherever the State Plumbing Board is
referred to or designated by the constitution or by any law or contract or other document,
after the effective date of the abolition of that board as provided in this Act any such
reference or designation is considered to apply to the State Licensing Board for Contractors.
(D) Legal proceedings and documents continued. Any legal proceeding to which
the State Plumbing Board is a party and which is filed, initiated, or pending before any court
on January 1, 2027, and all documents involved in or affected by such legal proceeding, shall
retain their effectiveness and shall be continued in the name of the State Licensing Board for
Contractors. All further legal proceedings and documents in the continuation, disposition,
and enforcement of such legal proceedings shall be in the name of the State Licensing Board
for Contractors, and the State Licensing Board for Contractors shall be substituted for the
party to which it is the successor without the necessity for amendment of any document to
substitute the name of that board it is succeeding or the name or title of any office, official,
employee, or other agent or representative of that board it is succeeding. Any legal
proceeding and all documents involved in or affected by such legal proceeding, which
proceeding has been continued in the name of the State Plumbing Board, shall retain their
effectiveness, and those provisions of this Act requiring that the continuation, disposition,
and enforcement of a legal proceeding and documents related thereto be in the name of the
party to which the State Licensing Board for Contractors is the successor does not affect
their validity.
(E)(1) Protection of obligations; federal assistance. All obligations of the State
Plumbing Board hereafter is considered to be the obligations of the State Licensing Board
for Contractors to the same extent as if originally made by the State Licensing Board for
Contractors and the same are hereby ratified. In like manner, and in order to prevent any
violation of the provisions, terms, or conditions of any gift, donation, deed, will, trust, or
other instrument or disposition by which property vested in the State Licensing Board for
Contractors by this Act was previously vested in the State Plumbing Board or diversion from
the purposes for which such property was so vested, it is hereby specifically provided that
each such instrument or disposition hereafter is considered to have vested such property in
Page 25 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
the State Licensing Board for Contractors in the same manner and to the same extent as if
originally so done.
(2) The State Licensing Board for Contractors is the successor in every way to the
State Plumbing Board, including with respect to obligations and debts of the State Plumbing
Board. All dedications and allocations of revenues and sources of revenues heretofore made
shall continue in the same manner, to the same extent, and for the same purposes as were
provided prior to the enactment of this Section of this Act, unless and until other provision
is made for such dedications and allocations.
(3) This Act shall not be construed or applied in any way which will prevent full
compliance by the state, or any department, office, or agency thereof, with the requirements
of any act of the Congress of the United States or any regulation made thereunder by which
federal aid or other federal assistance has been or hereafter is made available to this state,
or any department, office, agency, or subdivision thereof, anything contained in this Act to
the contrary notwithstanding, and such compliance hereafter shall be accomplished by the
State Licensing Board for Contractors.
(F) Transfer of property. All books, papers, records, money, actions, and other
property of every kind, movable and immovable, real and personal, heretofore possessed,
controlled, or used by the State Plumbing Board are hereby transferred to the State Licensing
Board for Contractors. All funds controlled by the State Plumbing Board are hereby
transferred to the State Licensing Board for Contractors.
(G) Transfer of employees. All employees engaged in the performance of duties of
the State Plumbing Board are hereby transferred to the State Licensing Board for Contractors
and are subject to applicable state civil service laws, rules, and regulations. Employee
positions in the unclassified service will remain in the unclassified service.
Section 7. The State Plumbing Board and the State Licensing Board of Contractors
shall take all necessary actions prior to January 1, 2027, including but not limited to
amending, adopting, and repealing administrative rules as are necessary to implement the
provisions of this Act.
Section 8. Sections 1 through 6 of this Act shall become effective on January 1,
2027.
Page 26 of 32
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1246 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 827
Section 9. Sections 7, 8, and this Section of this Act shall become effective upon
signature by the governor, or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for
bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section
18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved
by the legislature, Sections 7, 8, and this Section of this Act shall become effective on the
day following such approval.